Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.07.130

Underwriters—Selection.

(1) The authority shall adopt written policies to provide for the selection of underwriters. The policies shall provide for the creation of a roster of underwriters who the authority believes possess the requisite special expertise and professional standing to provide bond marketing services which would be accepted by bondholders and other members of the financial community, and which would be in furtherance of the public interest in marketing the authority's bonds at the lowest possible costs. Any underwriter may apply to have its name placed on the roster, but may not be placed on the roster unless it demonstrates to the authority's satisfaction that it meets the requirements of this section.

(2) Whenever the authority decides that it needs the services of an underwriter, it shall provide all underwriters on the roster with a notice of its intentions and shall invite each of them to submit to the authority an itemization of its fees and other charges for providing underwriting services on the issue. The itemization shall be by categories designed by the authority. The authority shall have wide discretion in selecting the underwriter it considers to be most appropriate to provide the services, but in the exercise of this discretion the authority shall consider the underwriter's fees and other charges and the public interest in achieving issuance of bonds on terms most favorable to the authority. The authority may adopt rules setting forth conditions under which an institution of higher education may be permitted to exercise the notice and selection procedures set forth in this subsection. These rules shall require the institution to comply with the provisions of this subsection as if it were the authority and to obtain the authority's prior approval of the selection of an underwriter.

[ 1983 c 169 s 14.]